Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Article 1. Capital Stock

§§ 261-272.
Repealed.
1971, No. 237 (Adj. Sess.), § 100.

§ 273.
Public service corporations, powers of Commission.

In authorizing the issue by a corporation, subject to its jurisdiction, of stock without par value as provided by section 262 of this title, the Public Utility Commission shall ascertain the amount of money that is reasonably necessary for the corporation for which such issue of stock has been authorized by the corporation.
The Commission shall fix the number of additional shares to be issued and the price per share at such number and prices as in its opinion the public interests shall require, taking into consideration the outstanding securities of the corporation, the value of its property devoted to the public use, the principal market value of such additional shares, and any other pertinent matters.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39, eff. March 1, 1961;

2017, No. 53

, § 12.

§ 274.
Attachment and sale of stock.

Shares of the capital stock in a private corporation may be attached by actually seizing the certificate, or certificates, or by leaving a copy of the attachment with the clerk of such corporation, and such attachment shall be valid except as to holders for value.
After receiving notice of the attachment, if the defendant transfers such stock or, if he or she has not previously transferred or pledged such stock, he or she refuses to deliver the same to the attaching officer on demand, he or she shall be liable for the conversion of the same.
The purchaser of such stock at an execution sale shall cause the certificate, or certificates, of such stock with an attested copy of the execution and officers’ return thereon to be left with the clerk of the corporation within 12 days after the sale, and the title of the stock so sold shall vest in the purchaser.

§ 275.
Repealed.
1971, No. 237 (Adj. Sess.), § 100.

§ 276.
Repealed.
1959, No. 262, § 37.

§ 277.
Repealed.
1971, No. 237 (Adj. Sess.), § 100.